Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1202
Debt management; exceptions to act.

Any person engaged in debt management shall be deemed to be rendering financial planning service, but sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 shall not apply to the following when engaged in the regular course of their respective businesses and professions:

(1) Attorneys at law;

(2) Banks, fiduciaries, financing and lending institutions, as duly authorized and admitted to transact business in this state and performing credit and financial adjusting service in the regular course of their principal business;

(3) Title insurers and abstract companies, while doing an escrow business;

(4) Employees of licensees under sections 69-1201 to 69-1217; or

(5) Judicial officers or others acting under court orders.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 2, p. 1180.